Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
FINDINGS AND POLICY
SECTION 1.
 Section 1,  chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), is amended
to read:
Sec. 1.  (1)(a) The people of Oregon find that  drug addiction and overdoses are a serious problem
in Oregon and that Oregon needs to expand access to drug treatment.
(b) The people  of Oregon further find that a health-based approach to addiction and overdose
is more effective, humane and cost-effective than criminal punishments. Making people  criminals
because  they  suffer from addiction is expensive, ruins lives and can make access to treatment and
recovery more difficult.
(2)(a) The purpose of [ this] the Drug Addiction Treatment and Recovery Act of  2020 is to make
screening, health assessment, treatment and recovery services for drug addiction  available to all
those who need  and want access to those services and to adopt a health approach to drug addiction
by removing criminal penalties for low-level drug possession.
(b) It  is the policy of the State of Oregon that screening, health assessment, treatment and re-
covery  services  for drug addiction are available to all those who need and want access to those
services.
(3) The provisions of [ this Act ] chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)),
shall be interpreted consistently with the findings,  purposes and policy objectives stated in this
section and shall not be limited by any policy set forth in  Oregon law that could conflict with or
be interpreted to conflict with the purposes and policy objectives stated in this section.
EXPANDING TREATMENT AND SERVICES
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 1
SECTION 2.  Section 2,  chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), is amended
to read:
Sec. 2.  [ Grants Program.  (1) The  Oversight and Accountability Council shall oversee and approve
grants to implement Addiction Recovery Centers and increase access to community care, as set forth
below.]
[(2) Addiction Recovery Centers.
 The Oversight  and Accountability Council shall provide grants
to existing agencies or organizations, whether government or  community-based, to create Addiction
Recovery Centers for the purposes of immediately triaging the acute needs  of people who use drugs and
assessing and addressing any on-going needs thorough intensive case management  and linkage to care
and services. ]
[(a) Grants must  be disbursed such that at least one center shall be established within each existing
coordinated care organization service area. Centers within  each existing coordinated care organization
service area shall be established and operational by October 1, 2021. ]
[(b) Grantees must be able to provide or display  an ability to provide the following services to any
Oregon resident who requests it, in order to receive funding as an Addiction Recovery Center: ]
[(i) 24/7 triage: Centers shall  assess a client’s need for immediate medical or other treatment
shortly upon the client’s arrival to determine what acute  care is needed and where it can be best pro-
vided. Centers shall provide this service twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week, 365 days a
year.]
[(ii) Health assessment: Centers shall conduct a comprehensive  behavioral health needs assessment
for each client, including a substance use disorder screening by a  certified alcohol and drug counselor
or other credentialed addiction treatment professional. The  assessment shall prioritize the self-identified
needs of the client. ]
[(iii) Individual intervention  plan, intensive case management and connection to services: If, after
the completion of the assessment, the client indicates a desire to address some or  all of the identified
needs, a case manager shall work with the client to design an individual intervention plan. The plan
must address the client’s need for substance use disorder treatment, coexisting health problems, hous-
ing, employment and training,  childcare and other services. Intensive case management requires, in the
least, that case managers have a sufficiently low staff-to-client ratio  to provide daily support as needed
to connect clients to services and care needed to fulfill the  individual intervention plan and have the
capacity to follow-up to ensure  clients are accessing care and, if not, to reconnect clients to care as
necessary and as desired by clients. ]
[(iv) Peer support: Each center shall offer  ongoing peer counseling and support from triage and
assessment through implementation of individual intervention plans as well as provide peer outreach
workers to engage directly with marginalized community  members who could potentially benefit from
the center’s services. ]
[(v) Outreach: Each center shall assess the need for, and provide,  mobile or virtual outreach ser-
vices to reach clients who are unable to access the center. ]
[(A) Notwithstanding subsection (2)(a) of  this section, only one center within each coordinated care
organization service area is required to provide the triage assessments set forth in  subsection (2)(b)(i)
of this section. ]
[(c) All services provided at the centers must be evidence-informed, trauma-informed,  culturally re-
sponsive, patient-centered, non-judgmental, and centered on principles of harm reduction. The  goal of
the individual intervention plan and intensive case management shall be to address  effectively the
client’s substance  use disorder and any other factors driving problematic behaviors without employing
coercion or shame or mandating abstinence. ]
[(d) The centers shall be adequately staffed to address the needs of people  with substance use dis-
order within their regions as determined by the Oversight and Accountability Council, but must in-
clude, at a minimum, at least one person qualified in each of the following categories: ]
[Certified alcohol and drug counselor or other credentialed addiction treatment professional; ]
[Intensive case manager; and, ]
[(C) Peer support specialist. ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 2
[(e) Each center shall provide  timely verification on behalf of any client who has completed a health
assessment, as set forth in subsection (2)(b)(ii) of this section, if the client requests such  verification to
comply with section 22 or section 23 (2) of this Act. ]
[(3) Increasing Community Access to  Care. The Oversight and Accountability Council shall provide
grants to existing agencies or organizations, whether government or community based, to  increase ac-
cess to one or more of the following: ]
[(a) Low barrier substance use  disorder treatment that is evidence-informed, trauma-informed, cul-
turally responsive, patient-centered, and non-judgmental; ]
[(b) Peer support and recovery services; ]
[(c) Transitional, supportive, and permanent housing for persons with substance use disorder; ]
[(d) Harm reduction interventions including, but not limited to,  overdose prevention education, ac-
cess to naloxone hydrochloride and sterile syringes, and stimulant-specific  drug education and out-
reach.]
[(4) The council shall prioritize providing  grants to community-based nonprofit organizations
within each coordinated care organization service area. However, if within any such service  area a
community-based nonprofit organization does  not apply for a grant or grants are not sought within that
service area for which services are needed, then the council  may request and fund grants to any com-
munity care organization or county within that service area. ]
[(5) Services provided by  grantees, including services provided by Addiction Recovery Centers,
shall be free of charge to the persons receiving the services. To the extent consistent with  applicable
law, grantees and service providers may  seek and obtain reimbursement for services provided to any
person from any insurer or entity providing insurance to that person. ]
(1) The Oversight and  Accountability Council shall oversee and approve grants and
funding to implement Behavioral Health Resource Networks and  increase access to commu-
nity care, as set forth below. A Behavioral Health Resource Network is an entity or  col-
lection of entities that individually or jointly provide some or all of the  services described in
subsection (2)(d) of this section.
(2)(a) The Oversight and Accountability Council,  in consultation with the Oregon Health
Authority, shall provide grants and  funding to agencies or organizations, whether govern-
ment or community based, to establish  Behavioral Health Resource Networks for the pur-
poses of immediately screening the acute needs of people who  use drugs and assessing and
addressing any ongoing needs through ongoing case management,  harm reduction, treat-
ment, housing and linkage to other care and services. Recipients of grants or funding to
provide substance use disorder treatment or services must  be licensed, certified or creden-
tialed by the state,  including certification under ORS 743A.168 (7), or meet criteria prescribed
by rule by the Oversight and Accountability Council under section 4, chapter 2, Oregon  Laws
2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)).  A recipient of a grant or funding under this subsection may
not use the grant or funding to supplant the recipient’s existing funding.
(b) The council and the authority shall ensure that residents of  each county have access
to all of the services described in paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(c) Applicants for grants and funding may apply individually or jointly with other network
participants to provide services in one or more counties.
(d) A  network must have the capacity to provide the following services and any other
services specified by the council by rule:
(A) Screening by certified addiction peer support  or wellness specialists or other qualified
persons designated by the council to determine a client’s need for immediate medical or
other treatment to determine what acute care is needed and where it  can be best provided,
identify other needs and link the client to other appropriate local or  statewide services, in-
cluding treatment for substance abuse and  coexisting health problems, housing, employment,
training and child care. Networks shall provide this service 24 hours a day, seven  days a
week, every calendar day of the year.  Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, only
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 3
one grantee in each network within each county is required to provide the screenings de-
scribed in this subparagraph.
(B) Comprehensive behavioral health needs assessment, including a substance use disor-
der screening by a certified alcohol  and drug counselor or other credentialed addiction
treatment professional. The assessment shall prioritize the self-identified needs of a client.
(C) Individual intervention planning, case management and connection  to services. If,
after the completion of a screening, a client indicates a desire to  address some or all of the
identified needs, a case  manager shall work with the client to design an individual inter-
vention plan. The plan must address the client’s need for substance use  disorder treatment,
coexisting health problems, housing, employment and training, child care and other services.
(D) Ongoing peer  counseling and support from screening and assessment through imple-
mentation of individual intervention plans as well as  peer outreach workers to engage di-
rectly with marginalized community members who could potentially benefit  from the
network’s services.
(E) Assessment of the need for, and provision of, mobile or virtual outreach services to:
(i) Reach clients who are unable to access the network; and
(ii) Increase public awareness of network services.
(F) Harm reduction  services and information and education about harm reduction ser-
vices.
(G) Low-barrier substance use disorder treatment.
(H) Transitional and supportive housing for individuals with substance use disorders.
(e) If an applicant for a grant or funding under this subsection is unable to  provide all
of the services described in paragraph (d) of this subsection, the applicant may  identify how
the applicant intends to partner with other entities to provide  the services, and the Oregon
Health Authority and the council may facilitate collaboration among applicants.
(f) All services provided through the  networks must be evidence-informed, trauma-
informed, culturally specific, linguistically responsive, person-centered and nonjudgmental.
The goal shall be to address effectively the client’s substance use and any other  social de-
terminants of health.
(g) The networks must be adequately  staffed to address the needs of people with sub-
stance use disorders within their regions as prescribed by the council by rule,  including, at
a minimum, at least  one person qualified by the Oregon Health Authority in each of the
following categories:
(A) Certified alcohol and drug counselor or other credentialed addiction treatment pro-
fessional;
(B) Case manager; and
(C) Certified addiction peer support or wellness specialist.
(h) Verification of a screening by a  certified addiction peer support specialist, wellness
specialist or other person  in accordance with subsection (2)(d)(A) of this section shall
promptly be provided to the client by the entity conducting the  screening. If the client exe-
cutes a valid release of information, the entity  shall provide verification of the screening to
the Oregon Health Authority or a contractor of the authority and the authority or the
authority’s contractor shall  forward the verification to the court, in the manner prescribed
by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, to satisfy the conditions for dismissal  under
section 22, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), or section 46 of  this 2021
Act.
(3)(a) If moneys remain in the Drug Treatment and  Recovery Services Fund after the
council has committed grants and funding to establish behavioral health resource  networks
serving every county in this state,  the council shall provide grants and funding to other
agencies or organizations, whether government or community based, and to the nine  feder-
ally recognized tribes in this state and service providers that are affiliated with the  nine
federally recognized tribes in this state to increase access to one or more of the following:
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 4
(A) Low-barrier substance use disorder treatment  that is evidence-informed, trauma-
informed, culturally specific, linguistically responsive, person-centered and nonjudgmental;
(B) Peer support and recovery services;
(C) Transitional, supportive and  permanent housing for persons with substance use dis-
order;
(D) Harm reduction interventions including, but  not limited to, overdose prevention ed-
ucation, access to naloxone hydrochloride and sterile syringes and  stimulant-specific drug
education and outreach; or
(E) Incentives and supports to  expand the behavioral health workforce to support the
services delivered by behavioral health resource networks and entities receiving grants or
funding under this subsection.
(b) A recipient of a  grant or funding under this subsection may not use the grant or
funding to supplant the recipient’s existing funding.
(4) In awarding  grants and funding under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
council shall:
(a) Distribute grants and funding to ensure access to:
(A) Historically underserved populations; and
(B) Culturally specific and linguistically responsive services.
(b) Consider any inventories or surveys of currently  available behavioral health services.
(c) Consider available  regional data related to the substance use disorder treatment
needs and the access to culturally specific  and linguistically responsive services in commu-
nities in this state.
(d) Consider the needs of residents  of this state for services, supports and treatment at
all ages.
(5) The council shall require any government entity that applies for  a grant to specify in
the application details regarding subgrantees and how the government entity will  fund cul-
turally specific organizations and culturally specific services. A government  entity receiving
a grant must make an explicit  commitment not to supplant or decrease any existing funding
used to provide services funded by the grant.
(6) In determining grants and  funding to be awarded, the council may consult the com-
prehensive addiction, prevention, treatment and  recovery plan established by the Alcohol and
Drug Policy Commission under ORS 430.223 and the advice of any other group, agency, or-
ganization or individual that desires to provide advice to the council  that is consistent with
the terms of this section.
(7) Services provided by grantees, including services  provided by a Behavioral Health
Resource Network, shall be free of charge to the clients  receiving the services. Grantees in
each network shall seek reimbursement from insurance issuers, the medical assistance  pro-
gram or any other third party responsible for the cost of services provided to a  client and
grants and  funding provided by the council or the authority under subsection (2) of this
section may be used for  copayments, deductibles or other out-of-pocket costs incurred by the
client for the services.
(8) Subsection (7) of this section does  not require the medical assistance program to re-
imburse the cost of services for which another third party is responsible in violation of  42
U.S.C. 1396a(25).
SECTION 2a.
(1) Grants and funding under section 2 (2), chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021
(Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), must be disbursed  such that at least one Behavioral Health Re-
source Network is established and operational within each county by January 1, 2022.
(2) If the recipients of grants and  funding under section 2 (2), chapter 2, Oregon Laws
2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), cannot provide all of  the services described in section 2
(2)(d), chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), within a county by January
1, 2022, the  Oversight and Accountability Council and the Oregon Health Authority shall is-
sue additional requests for proposals to provide the necessary services.
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 5
SECTION 3.  Section 3, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110  (2020)), is amended
to read:
Sec. 3.  [ Oversight and  Accountability Council. ] (1)(a) The Director of the Oregon Health Au-
thority shall establish an Oversight and Accountability Council for the purpose of determining how
funds will be distributed to grant applicants and to  oversee the implementation of the [ Centers]
Behavioral Health Resource Networks  pursuant to section 2 , chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021
(Ballot Measure 110 (2020)) . The council shall be formed on or before February 1, 2021.
[(a)] (b) The council shall [ be comprised ] consist of qualified individuals with experience in
substance use disorder treatment  and other addiction services. The council shall consist of at least
one member from each of the following categories only:
[(i)] (A) A representative of the Oregon Health Authority, Health Systems Division Behavioral
Health Services  as a nonvoting member ;
[(ii)] (B) Three  members of communities that have been disproportionately impacted by arrests,
prosecution or sentencing for conduct that has been classified or reclassified  as a Class E violation
[pursuant to section 11 to section 19. ];
[(iii)] (C) A physician specializing in addiction medicine;
[(iv)] (D) A licensed clinical social worker;
[(v)] (E) An evidence-based substance use disorder provider;
[(vi)] (F) A harm reduction services provider;
[(vii)] (G) A person specializing in housing services for people with substance use disorder or
a diagnosed mental health condition;
[(viii)] (H) An academic researcher specializing in drug use or drug policy;
[(ix)] (I) At least two people who suffered or suffer from substance use disorder;
[(x)] (J) At least two recovery peers;
[(xi)] (K) A mental or behavioral health care provider;
[(xii)] (L) A representative of a coordinated care organization; [ and,]
[(xiii)] (M) A person who works for  a [ non-profit] nonprofit organization that advocates for
persons who experience or have experienced substance use disorder[ .]; and
(N) The Director of the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission or the director’s designated
staff person, as a nonvoting member.
(2) A quorum consists of [ nine] two-thirds of the  members  of the council, rounded up  to the
next odd number of members .
(3) The term of office for  a member of the council [ shall be ] is  four years. Vacancies shall be
appointed for the unexpired term.
(4)(a) To the extent permissible by  law, a member of the council performing services for the
council may receive  compensation from [ his or her ] the member’s  employer for time spent per-
forming services as a council member.
(b) If a member of the council is not  compensated by [ their] the member’s  employer as set forth
in [ subsection (4)(a) of this section ] paragraph (a) of this subsection , that member shall be entitled
to compensation and expenses as provided in ORS 292.495.
[(c) Nothing in this subsection (4) of this section excuses or exempts a member of the council form
complying with any applicable provision of Oregon’s ethics laws  and regulations, including the pro-
visions of ORS chapter 244. ]
(5) Members of the council  are subject to and must comply with the provisions of ORS
chapter 244, including ORS 244.045 (4), 244.047, 244.120 and 244.130.
SECTION 4.
 Section 4, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110  (2020)), is amended
to read:
Sec. 4.  [ Administration.] (1)(a) On or before June 30,  2021 , the Oversight and Accountability
Council shall adopt rules that  establish general criteria and requirements for the [ Addiction Recov-
ery Centers ] Behavioral Health Resource Networks  and  the grants  and funding required by sec-
tion 2 , chapter 2, Oregon Laws  2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), including rules requiring
recipients of grants and funding  to collect and report information necessary for the Secre-
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 6
tary of State to conduct the financial and performance audits required by  section 24, chapter
2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)) .
(b) The council shall from  time to time adopt such rules, and amend and revise rules [ it] the
council has adopted, as [ it] the council deems proper and necessary for  the administration of [ this
Act] chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)),  and the performance  of [ its] the
council’s work.
(2) The council shall have and retain the  authority to implement and oversee the [ Addiction
Recovery Centers created by ] Behavioral  Health Resource Networks established under  section
2, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)),  and the  grants [ program created and
required by ] and funding under  section 2 , chapter 2,  Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110
(2020)).
(3) The Oregon Health Authority[ , Health Systems  Division Behavioral Health Services ] shall
administer and provide all necessary support to  ensure the implementation of [ this Act ] chapter 2,
Oregon Laws 2021  (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), and that recipients of grants or funding com-
ply with all applicable rules regulating the provision of behavioral health services .
(4)(a) The [ Oregon Health Authority, Health Systems Division Behavioral  Health Services, ] au-
thority, in consultation with the council, may enter into interagency agreements to ensure  proper
distribution of funds for the grants [ created and ] required by section 2 , chapter 2,  Oregon Laws
2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)) .
(b) The [ Oregon Health Authority,  Health Systems Division Behavioral Health Services ] authority
shall encourage and take all reasonable measures to ensure that grant  recipients cooperate, coor-
dinate and act jointly with one another to offer the services described in section 2 , chapter 2,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)) .
(c) The authority shall  post to the authority’s website, at the time a grant or funding is
awarded:
(A) The name of the recipient of the grant or funding;
(B) The names of any subgrantees or subcontractors of the recipient  of the grant or
funding; and
(C) The amount of the grant or funding awarded.
(5) The [ Oregon Health Authority, Health  Systems Division Behavioral Health Services ] authority
shall provide requested technical, logistical and other support to the council to assist the  council
with [ its] the council’s  duties and obligations.
(6) The Department of Justice shall provide legal services to the council if  requested to
assist the council in carrying out the council’s duties and obligations.
FUNDING
SECTION 5.
 Section 5, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110  (2020)), is amended
to read:
Sec. 5.  (1) The Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund is established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Drug Treatment and
Recovery Services Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys deposited into the fund pursuant  to section 6 , chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020));
(b) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(c) Moneys allocated from the Oregon Marijuana Account, pursuant to ORS 475B.759 (7); [ and,]
(d) Moneys allocated from the Criminal Fine Account pursuant to ORS 137.300 (4); and
[(d)] (e)  All other moneys deposited [ in] into the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated to the  Oregon Health Authority for
the purposes set forth in section 2 , chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)) .
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 7
[(4) Unexpended moneys in the fund may not lapse and shall be carried  forward and may be used
without regard to fiscal year or biennium. ]
[(5)(a)] (4)(a) Pursuant to subsection (2)(b)  of this section, the Legislative Assembly shall ap-
propriate or transfer to the fund an amount sufficient to fully fund  the grants program required by
section 2 , chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)) .
(b) The total amount deposited and transferred into the fund shall not be  less than $57 million
for the first year [ this Act ] chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)),  is in effect.
(c) In each subsequent year, [ that] the minimum transfer  amount set forth  in paragraph (b)
of this  subsection [ (5)(b) of this section ] shall be increased by not less than the sum of :
[(i)] (A) $57 million multiplied by  the percentage [ (if any) ], if any,  by which the monthly av-
eraged U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index for the 12 consecutive months ending [ December]
August 31  of the prior calendar year exceeds the monthly index for the fourth quarter of the cal-
endar year 2020; and[ ,]
[(ii)] (B) [ An amount not less than  the increase ] The annual increase, if any,  in moneys dis-
tributed pursuant to ORS 475B.759 (7).
SECTION 6.  Section 6, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110  (2020)), is amended
to read:
Sec. 6.  (1) The Department  of Revenue shall credit and transfer or cause to be credited and
transferred to the Drug Treatment and Recovery  Services Fund the savings to the State of Oregon
from the implementation of  [ this Act ] chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)),
as calculated in section 7 , chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)) .
(2) If the savings calculated for any subsequent biennium under section 7 (1) , chapter 2, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)),  is less than any prior biennium,  the amount credited and
transferred to the Drug Treatment  and Recovery Services Fund shall be the highest amount calcu-
lated for any previous biennium.
(3) The savings as calculated in section 7 , chapter 2, Oregon Laws  2021 (Ballot Measure 110
(2020)), shall be transferred on  or before the end of the fiscal year in which the calculation is
completed.
SECTION 7.  Section 7,  chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), is amended
to read:
Sec. 7.  (1)(a) Within 180 days of [ the end of first biennium in which this Act becomes effective,
and within 180 days of the end of  each subsequent biennium ] June 30, 2021, and every June 30
thereafter, the [ Office of Economic Analysis ] Oregon Department  of Administrative Services
shall calculate the  savings to the State of Oregon resulting from the [ sentence reductions set forth
in section 11 to section 20 ] reductions to Class E violations for offenses described  in ORS
475.752, 475.814, 475.824, 475.834, 475.854, 475.874, 475.884 and 475.894 , including any savings re-
sulting from reductions in arrests, incarceration and supervision.
(b) The savings shall be calculated based on  a comparison of the most recent biennium con-
cluded at the time the calculation is made and the biennium [ immediately preceding the biennium  in
which this Act became effective ] ending June 30, 2019 .
(2) In  making the calculations set forth in this section, the [ Office of Economic Analysis ] de-
partment shall use  actual data. The [ Office of Economic Analysis ] department  may use best
available estimates [ where] when actual data is unavailable.
SECTION 8.  Section 8, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110  (2020)), is amended
to read:
Sec. 8.  Moneys transferred to the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services  Fund and distributed
pursuant to section  2 , chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)),  shall, to the
maximum extent consistent with law, be in  addition to and not in replacement of any existing allo-
cations or appropriations for the purposes of  providing substance use disorder treatment, peer sup-
port and  recovery services, transitional, supportive and permanent housing for persons with
substance use disorders, harm reduction interventions[ ,] and for  establishing [ Addiction Recovery
Centers] Behavioral Health Resource Networks .
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 8
SECTION 9.  Section 9, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110  (2020)), is amended
to read:
Sec. 9.  [ Account Allocation. ] [ (1)] The Oregon Health Authority shall cause  the moneys in the
Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund to be distributed as follows:
[(a)] (1)(a) An  amount necessary for administration of [ section 2 to section 4 ] sections 2 to 4,
chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)),  not to exceed [ 4% ] four percent  of
the moneys deposited into the fund in any biennium.
(b) The amounts  necessary for administration described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section do not include expenditures to establish and maintain the  telephone hotline described
in section 23 (1), chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)).
[(b)] (2) After the distribution set forth in subsection [ (1)(a)] (1) of this  section, the remaining
moneys in the fund shall be distributed to the grants program as  set forth in section 2 , chapter 2,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)) .
SECTION 10.  ORS 475B.759, as amended  by section 10, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)), is amended to read:
475B.759. (1) There is established the Oregon Marijuana Account,  separate and distinct from the
General Fund.
(2) The account [ shall consist ] consists  of moneys transferred to the account under ORS
475B.760.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys  available in the
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, and after making the transfer of  moneys required
by subsection (7) of this section, the department shall transfer quarterly  20 percent of the moneys
in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to  the cities of this state in
the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in  shares that reflect the popu-
lation of each city of this state that  is not exempt from this paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)
of this section compared to the population  of all cities of this state that are not exempt from this
paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)  of this section, as determined by Portland State University
under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately preceding the date of the transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last  business day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the  transfer for premises located in each city com-
pared to the number of licenses  held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on
the last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the following
shares:
(i) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with  marijuana producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475B.070 on the last business day  of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located in each county compared to the total commercially available  area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana producer licenses held pursuant  to ORS 475B.070 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number  of li-
censes held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last  business day of the cal-
endar quarter preceding the date of the  transfer for premises located in each county compared to
the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last  business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
(c) After making the transfer of moneys  required by subsection (7) of this section, [ eighty] 80
percent of the remaining moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account must be used as follows:
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 9
(A) Forty percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
(B) Twenty percent of the moneys in the account  must be used solely for mental health treat-
ment or for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment;
(C) Fifteen percent of the  moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020 may be used; and
(D) Five percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely  for purposes related to al-
cohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
(4)(a) A city that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of  a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105  is required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section.
(b) A county  that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS  475B.070 is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection (3)(b)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which  issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105  is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B)(ii) of this section.
(5)(a) A city or county that is ineligible under subsection (4) of this section  to receive a transfer
of moneys from the Oregon Marijuana Account during a given quarter but has received  a transfer
of moneys for that quarter shall return the amount transferred to the Department of  Revenue, with
interest as described under paragraph (f) of this subsection. An ineligible city or county may  vol-
untarily transfer the moneys to the Department of Revenue immediately upon receipt of  the ineli-
gible transfer.
(b) If the Director of the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services determines that a city
or county received a transfer of moneys under subsection (3)(b) of this section but  was ineligible to
receive that transfer under subsection (4) of this section, the  director shall provide notice to the
ineligible city or county and order the city or county to return the amount received to the  Depart-
ment of Revenue, with interest  as described under paragraph (f) of this subsection. A city or county
may appeal the order within 30 days of the date  of the order under the procedures for a contested
case under ORS chapter 183.
(c) As soon as the order under  paragraph (b) of this subsection becomes final, the director shall
notify the Department of Revenue and the ineligible city or county. Upon notification,  the Depart-
ment of Revenue immediately shall proceed to collect the amount stated in the notice.
(d) The Department of Revenue shall have  the benefit of all laws of the state pertaining to the
collection of income and excise  taxes and may proceed to collect the amounts described in the no-
tice under paragraph (c) of this subsection. An assessment of tax is not necessary  and the collection
described in this subsection is not precluded by any statute of limitations.
(e) If a city or county is subject  to an order to return moneys from an ineligible transfer, the
city or county  shall be denied any further relief in connection with the ineligible transfer on or after
the date that the order becomes final.
(f) Interest under this section shall accrue at the  rate established in ORS 305.220 beginning on
the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(g) Both the moneys  and the interest collected from or returned by an ineligible city or county
shall be redistributed to the cities or counties that were eligible to receive  a transfer under sub-
section (3)(b) of this section on the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(6)(a) Not later than July 1 of each year, each  city and county in this state shall certify with
the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services whether the city or county has an ordinance
prohibiting the establishment of a premises  for which issuance of a license under ORS 475B.070,
475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required. The  certification shall be made concurrently with the
certifications under ORS 221.770, in a form and manner prescribed by the Oregon  Department of
Administrative Services.
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 10
(b) If a  city fails to comply with this subsection, the city is not eligible to receive transfers of
moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section. If a county fails to  comply with this subsection,
the county is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B) of this section.
(c) A city or county that repeals an ordinance as  provided in ORS 475B.496 shall file an updated
certification with the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services in a form and manner pre-
scribed by the department, noting the effective date  of the change. A city or county that repeals an
ordinance as provided in ORS 475B.496 is eligible  to receive quarterly transfers of moneys under
this section  for quarters where the repeal is effective for the entire quarter and the updated certif-
ication was filed at least 30 days before the date of transfer.
(7) Before making the transfer of  moneys required by subsection (3) of this section, the depart-
ment shall transfer quarterly to the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund  all moneys in the
Oregon Marijuana Account in excess of $11,250,000.
SECTION 10a. During calendar year 2021,  the Oversight and Accountability Council may
award up to $13 million in grants under section 2, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021  (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)), based on grant applications received  and provisionally approved by the
council in calendar year 2021, as authorized by section 12, chapter 4, Oregon Laws 2021  (En-
rolled House Bill 5042).
VIOLATION PROCEDURES
SECTION 11.  ORS 153.012, as amended by section 18, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021  (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)), is amended to read:
153.012. Violations are classified for the purpose of sentencing into the following categories:
(1) Class A violations[ ;].
(2) Class B violations[ ;].
(3) Class C violations[ ;].
(4) Class D violations[ ;].
(5) Class E violations[ ;].
(6) Unclassified violations as described in ORS 153.015[ ; and ].
(7) Specific fine violations as described in ORS 153.015.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 153.018, as amended by section 19, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)), is amended to read:
153.018. (1) The penalty for  committing a violation is a fine. The law creating a violation may
impose other penalties in addition to a fine but may not impose a term of imprisonment.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, the maximum fine  for a violation committed by an in-
dividual is:
(a) $2,000 for a Class A violation.
(b) $1,000 for a Class B violation.
(c) $500 for a Class C violation.
(d) $250 for a Class D violation.
(e) $100[ , or, in lieu of the fine, a completed health assessment as specified in section 2  (2)(b)(ii)
or section 23 (2), ] for a Class E violation.
(f) $2,000 for a specific fine violation, or the maximum amount otherwise established by law for
the specific fine violation.
(3) If a special corporate fine is specified in the law creating the violation, the sentence to pay
a fine shall be governed by the law  creating the violation. Except as otherwise provided by law, if
a special corporate fine is not specified in the law creating the  violation, the maximum fine for a
violation committed by a corporation is:
(a) $4,000 for a Class A violation.
(b) $2,000 for a Class B violation.
(c) $1,000 for a Class C violation.
(d) $500 for a Class D violation.
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 11
SECTION 13.  ORS 153.019 is amended to read:
153.019. (1) Except as provided in  ORS 153.020  and sections 22 and 23, chapter 2, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)) , the presumptive fines for violations are:
(a) $440 for a Class A violation.
(b) $265 for a Class B violation.
(c) $165 for a Class C violation.
(d) $115 for a Class D violation.
(e) $100 for a Class E violation.
(2) The presumptive fine for a specific fine violation is:
(a) The amount specified by statute as the presumptive fine for the violation; or
(b) An amount equal  to the greater of 20 percent of the maximum fine prescribed for the vio-
lation, or the minimum fine prescribed by statute for the violation.
(3) Any  surcharge imposed under ORS 1.188 shall be added to and made a part of the
presumptive fine.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 153.021 is amended to read:
153.021. (1) Except as otherwise provided by law, a court may not defer, waive, suspend or oth-
erwise reduce the  fine for a violation that is subject to the presumptive fines established by ORS
153.019 (1) or 153.020 to an amount that is less than:
(a) $225 for a Class A violation.
(b) $135 for a Class B violation.
(c) $85 for a Class C violation.
(d) $65 for a Class D violation.
(e) $45 for a Class E violation.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, a court may  not defer, waive, suspend or otherwise
reduce the fine for a specific fine violation to an amount that is less than  20 percent of the
presumptive fine for the violation.
(3) This section  does not affect the manner in which a court imposes or reduces monetary obli-
gations other than fines.
(4) The  Department of Revenue or Secretary of State may audit any court to determine whether
the court is complying with the  requirements of this section. In addition, the Department of Revenue
or Secretary of State may audit any court  to determine whether the court is complying with the
requirements of ORS 137.145 to  137.159 and 153.640 to 153.680. The Department of Revenue or Sec-
retary of State may  file an action under ORS 34.105 to 34.240 to enforce the requirements of this
section and of ORS 137.145 to 137.159 and 153.640 to 153.680.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 153.064 is amended to read:
153.064. (1)  Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a warrant for arrest may be is-
sued against a person who fails to make a first appearance on a citation for a violation,  or fails to
appear at any other subsequent time set  for trial or other appearance, only if the person is charged
with failure to appear in a violation proceeding under ORS 153.992.
(2) If a person fails to  make a first appearance on a citation for a violation  other than a Class
E violation, or  fails to appear at any other subsequent time set for trial or other appearance  on a
violation other than a Class E violation , the court may issue  an order that requires the defendant
to appear and show cause why  the defendant should not be held in contempt. The show cause order
may be mailed to the defendant by certified mail, return receipt requested.  If service cannot be ac-
complished by mail, the defendant must be personally served. If the defendant is served  and fails to
appear at the time specified in the show cause  order, the court may issue an arrest warrant for the
defendant for the purpose of bringing the defendant before the court.
SECTION 16.  ORS 153.992 is amended to read:
153.992. (1) A person commits the offense of failure to appear in a violation proceeding if  the
person has been served with a [ violation] citation issued under  this chapter for a violation other
than a Class E violation  and the person knowingly fails to do any of the following:
(a) Make a first appearance in the manner required by ORS 153.061 within the time allowed.
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 12
(b) Make appearance at the time set for trial in the violation proceeding.
(c) Appear at any other time required by the court or by law.
(2) Failure to appear on a violation citation is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 670.280, as amended by section 21, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021  (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)), is amended to read:
670.280. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “License” includes a registration, certification or permit.
(b) “Licensee” includes a registrant or a holder of a certification or permit.
(2) Except as provided in ORS 342.143  (3) or 342.175 (3), a licensing board, commission or agency
may not deny, suspend or revoke an occupational  or professional license solely for the reason that
the applicant  or licensee has been convicted of a crime, but it may consider the relationship of the
facts which support the conviction  and all intervening circumstances to the specific occupational
or professional standards in  determining the fitness of the person to receive or hold the license.
There is a rebuttable presumption as  to each individual applicant or licensee that an existing or
prior conviction for conduct that has been  classified or reclassified as a Class E violation [ pursuant
to section 11 to section 19 ] does not make an applicant for an occupational or professional  license
or a licensee with an occupational or professional license unfit to receive or hold the license.
(3) Except as provided in ORS 342.143 (3) and  342.175 (3), a licensing board, commission or
agency may deny an occupational or professional license or impose discipline on a licensee  based
on conduct that is not undertaken directly in the course of the licensed activity,  but that is sub-
stantially related to the fitness and ability of the applicant or licensee to  engage in the activity for
which the  license is required. In determining whether the conduct is substantially related to the
fitness and ability of the applicant or licensee to engage in the activity for which the license  is re-
quired, the licensing board, commission  or agency shall consider the relationship of the facts with
respect to the conduct and all intervening circumstances  to the specific occupational or professional
standards. There is a rebuttable presumption as  to each individual applicant or licensee that an
existing or  prior conviction for conduct that has been classified or reclassified as a Class E violation
[pursuant to section 11 to section 19 ] is not related to the fitness  and ability of the applicant or
licensee to engage in the activity for which the license is required.
SECTION 18.
Section 19 of  this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 153.
SECTION 19. (1) An enforcement officer issuing a citation for a Class E violation  shall
provide the person receiving the citation with information concerning how the person may
complete a screening, as specified in section 2 (2)(d)(A), chapter 2, Oregon Laws  2021 (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)).
(2) The requirement  described in subsection (1) of this section may be satisfied by pro-
viding the person with the  number for the telephone hotline established under section 23,
chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)).
SECTION 20.
 Section 22, chapter 2, Oregon Laws  2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), is amended
to read:
Sec. 22.  [ Any person subject to the penalty set  forth in ORS 153.018 (2)(e) for a violation that has
been classified or reclassified as a Class E violation pursuant to section 11 to section 19, shall  be fined
up to $100, but in lieu of the fine, may complete a  health assessment, as set forth in section 2 (2)(b)(ii),
at an Addiction Recovery Center. Upon verification  that the person has received a health assessment
at an Addiction Recovery  Center within 45 days of when the person receives a citation for a violation
subject to the penalty set forth in ORS 153.018 (2)(e), the fine shall be waived.  Failure to pay the fine
shall not be a basis for further penalties or for a term of incarceration. ]
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 153.018, 153.019 and 153.021, and subject to subsection (2) of this
section, a person subject to the penalty for a Class E violation may, in lieu of the  fine,
complete a screening, as set forth in section 2  (2)(d)(A), chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)), or any other equivalent or more  intensive treatment contact, within 45
days of when the person receives the citation for the Class E violation.
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 13
(2) Upon receiving verification that the  person has obtained a screening through a Be-
havioral Health Resource Network, including the telephone hotline described in section 23 (1),
chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), or any other equivalent or more
intensive treatment  contact, within the time period described in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion, the court shall dismiss the citation.
(3) The failure to pay a fine on a Class E violation is not a basis for further penalties or
for a term of incarceration.
OVERSIGHT AND ADMINISTRATION
SECTION 21.
 Section 23, chapter 2, Oregon Laws  2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), is amended
to read:
Sec. 23.  [Implementation. (1) Not later than February 1, 2021, the Oregon Health Authority, Health
Systems Division Behavioral Health Services shall establish  a statewide temporary telephone Addiction
Recovery  Center.  The temporary telephone Addiction Recovery Center shall be staffed twenty-four hours
a day, seven days a week,  365 days a year. The temporary telephone Addiction Recovery Center shall
provide the services set forth in section 2 (2)(b)(i)-(iii) and the verification set forth in section 2 (2)(e). ]
[(2) Until such time as an Addiction Recovery Center is established in the coordinated care or-
ganization service area where a person subject to the penalty set  forth in ORS 153.018 (2)(e) for a vi-
olation that has been classified or reclassified as a Class E violation pursuant to section 11  to section
19 resides,  the person shall be fined up to $100, but in lieu of the fine may complete a health assess-
ment, as set forth in section 2 (2)(b)(ii), through the temporary telephone Addiction  Recovery Center.
Upon verification that the person has received a health assessment through the  temporary telephone
Addiction Recovery Center within 45 days of when the person receives a citation for  a violation subject
to the penalty set forth in  ORS 153.018 (2)(e), the fine shall be waived. Failure to pay the fine shall
not be a basis for further penalties or for a term of incarceration. ]
[(3) When an Addiction Recovery Center is  established in each coordinated care organization ser-
vice area,  and not later than October 1, 2021, the temporary telephone Addiction Recovery Center shall
be terminated.]
(1) Not later  than February 1, 2021, the Oregon Health Authority shall establish a Be-
havioral Health Resource Network statewide telephone hotline to:
(a) Provide screenings under section 2 (2)(d), chapter  2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Meas-
ure 110 (2020)), to any resident  in this state by certified addiction peer support or wellness
specialists, as defined by the authority by rule, or other  qualified persons designated by the
Oversight and Accountability Council;
(b) Assess a caller’s need for immediate medical  care or other treatment and determine
what acute care is needed and where it can be provided;
(c) Identify other needs of the caller; and
(d) Link the caller to  other appropriate local or statewide services, including treatment
for substance abuse and other coexisting health problems, housing, employment, training and
child care.
(2) The telephone hotline shall be staffed 24 hours  a day, seven days a week, every cal-
endar day of the year. Following a screening, at the request of a  caller, the telephone hotline
shall promptly provide the verification set forth in section 2 (2)(h), chapter 2, Oregon Laws
2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)).
SECTION 22.
 Section 24, chapter 2, Oregon Laws  2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), is amended
to read:
Sec. 24.  [Audits. (1) No later than December 31, 2022, and  at least once every two years thereafter,
the Oregon Secretary  of State, Audits Division shall conduct financial and performance audits re-
garding the uses of the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund and the effectiveness of the fund
in achieving the purposes of the fund and the policy objectives of this Act. The audit shall include: ]
[(a) Data on grant programs, including: ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 14
[(i) A list of organizations and agencies receiving moneys from the fund; ]
[(ii) The amount each organization and agency received from the fund; ]
[(iii) The total number of organizations and agencies that applied for moneys from the fund; ]
[(iv) The moneys that remained in the fund after funds were disbursed; ]
[(v) The moneys used to administer the programs selected by the fund; ]
[(vi) The effectiveness of the grants in increasing access to substance use  disorder treatment, peer
support and recovery services, harm reduction interventions as  well as housing placement, and any
other relevant outcome measures; ]
[(b) Data on Addiction Recovery Centers, including: ]
[(i) The outcomes  of each center, including, but not limited to, the number of clients with substance
use disorder  served by each center, the average duration of client participation, and client outcomes,
including rates of recidivism, substance use disorder treatment  completion, ability to obtain housing,
employment, and legitimate income; ]
[(ii) The number of  people seeking assistance from the center who are denied or not connected to
substance use disorder treatment and other services, and the reasons for such denials; ]
[(iii) The average wait time it takes for people at the center to be able to  fulfill their individual
intervention plan and the reason for any delays, such as waiting lists at referred services; ]
[(iv) The total amount of money disbursed to each center. ]
[(c) Data on implementation,  including, the number of citations for Class E violations issued and
the race of the person receiving a citation for a Class E violation; ]
[(2) The audits  set forth in subsection (a) of this section shall be conducted pursuant to the pro-
visions of Oregon  Revised Statutes Chapter 297 (and any subsequent modifications or amendments to
those statutes), except to the extent any provision of chapter  297 conflicts with any provision of this
Act , in which case the provisions of this Act shall control. ]
[(3) The Audits Division shall  monitor and report annually on agency progress in implementing
recommendations made in the audits. The  Audits Division shall follow up on recommendations as part
of recurring audit work or as an activity separate from other audit activity. When following up  on re-
commendations, the Audits Division may request from the  appropriate agency evidence of implementa-
tion.]
(1) The Division of Audits of the office of the Secretary of State shall conduct perform-
ance audits and financial reviews as provided in this section, regarding the  uses of the Drug
Treatment and  Recovery Services Fund and the effectiveness of the fund in achieving the
purposes of the fund and the policy objectives  of section 1, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021
(Ballot Measure 110 (2020)). Recipients of grants or funds under  section 2, chapter 2, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110  (2020)), shall keep accurate books, records and accounts that
are subject to inspection and audit by the division.
(2) No later than two years after the completion of an audit or financial review,  the di-
vision shall monitor  and report on the progress in implementing any recommendations made
in the audit or financial review. The division shall follow up  on recommendations as part of
recurring audit work or as an activity separate from other audit activity. When  following
up on recommendations, the division may request from the appropriate agency evidence  of
implementation.
(3) The audits set forth in this section shall be conducted pursuant to the  provisions of
ORS chapter 297, except to the extent any provision of ORS chapter 297  conflicts with any
provision of sections 1 to 9, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), in which
case the provisions of sections 1 to 9, chapter 2, Oregon  Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110
(2020)), shall control.
(4) No later than December 31, 2023, the division shall perform a:
(a) Real-time audit, as prescribed by the division, which shall include an assessment of
the relationship between the Oversight and Accountability  Council and the Oregon Health
Authority, the  relationship between the council and recipients of grants or funding and the
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 15
structural integrity of sections 1 to 9, chapter 2, Oregon Laws  2021 (Ballot Measure 110
(2020)), including but not limited to assessing:
(A) Whether the organizational structure of the council contains conflicts or problems.
(B) Whether the rules adopted by the council are clear and functioning properly.
(C) Whether the council has  sufficient authority and independence to achieve the
council’s mission.
(D) Whether the authority is fulfilling authority’s duties under sections 3, 4, 5, 9 and 23,
chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)).
(E) Whether there are conflicts of interest  in the process of awarding grants or funding.
(F) Whether there are opportunities to expand collaboration between the council and
state agencies.
(G) Whether barriers exist in data collection and evaluation mechanisms.
(H) Who is providing the data.
(I) Other areas identified by the division.
(b) Financial review, which shall include an assessment of the following:
(A) The functioning of the grants  and funding systems between the council, the authority
and recipients of grants or funding, including  by gathering information on who is receiving
what grants and funding, the process of applying for the  grants and funding and whether
that process is conducive to obtaining qualified applicants and  applicants from communities
of color.
(B) Whether grants and funding are going to organizations that are  culturally responsive
and linguistically specific, including an assessment of:
(i) The barriers that exist for grant and funding applicants who are Black,  Indigenous
or People of Color.
(ii) The applicants that were denied and why.
(iii) Whether grants and  other funding are being disbursed based on the priorities speci-
fied in section 2, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)).
(iv) For government entities receiving grants or funding  under section 2, chapter 2,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), the government entities’ subgrantees and
whether the governmental entity supplanted or decreased any local funding dedicated to the
same services  after receiving grants or funds under section 2, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021
(Ballot Measure 110 (2020)).
(v) Whether the authority has stayed within its administrative spending cap.
(vi) What proportion of grants or funds  received by grantees and others under section
2, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), was devoted  to administrative
costs.
(C) The organizations and agencies receiving grants or funding under section 2,  chapter
2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), and:
(i) Which of the organizations and agencies are Behavioral Health Resource Network
entities.
(ii) The amount each organization and agency received.
(iii) The total number of organizations and agencies that applied for grants or funding.
(iv) The amount of moneys  from the fund that were used to administer the programs
selected by the council.
(v) The moneys that remained in the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund  after
grants and funding were disbursed.
(vi) A performance assessment of each grant or funding recipient.
(D) Other areas identified by the division.
(5) No later than December 31, 2024,  the division shall conduct a performance audit,
which must include an assessment of the following:
(a) All relevant data regarding the implementation of sections  22 and 23, chapter 2,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), including demographic information  on indi-
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 16
viduals who receive  citations subject to sections 22 and 23, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021
(Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), and  whether the citations resulted in connecting the individuals
with treatment.
(b) The functioning of:
(A) Law enforcement and the courts in relation to Class E violation citations;
(B) The telephone hotline operated by the authority; and
(C) Entities providing verification of screenings under section 2, chapter 2, Oregon  Laws
2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)).
(c) Disparities shown by demographic data and whether the citation data reveals a  dis-
proportionate use of citations in communities most impacted by the war on drugs.
(d) Whether sections 2, 22  and 23, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110
(2020)), reduce the involvement  in the criminal justice system of individuals with substance
use disorder.
(e) Outcomes for individuals receiving treatment and other social services under  section
2, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), including, but  not limited to, the
following:
(A) Whether access to care increased since  December 3, 2020, and, if data is available,
whether, since December 3, 2020:
(i) The number of drug and alcohol treatment service providers increased.
(ii) The number of culturally specific providers increased.
(iii) Overdose rates have decreased.
(iv) Access to harm reduction services has increased.
(v) More individuals are accessing treatment than they were before December 3, 2020.
(vi) Access to housing for individuals with substance use disorder has increased.
(B) Data on Behavioral Health Resource Networks and recipients  of grants and funding
under section 2, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), including:
(i) The outcomes of each network  or recipient, including but not limited to the number
of clients with substance use disorder receiving services from each network or recipient, the
average duration of client participation and client outcomes.
(ii) The number of individuals seeking assistance from the network or recipients who are
denied or  not connected to substance use disorder treatment and other services, and the
reasons for the denials.
(iii) The  average time it takes for clients to access services and fulfill their individual
intervention plan and the reason for any delays, such as waiting lists at referred services.
(iv) Whether average times to access services to which clients are referred, such  as
housing or medically assisted treatment, have decreased over time since December 3, 2020.
(v) Demographic data on  clients served by Behavioral Health Resource Networks, in-
cluding self-reported demographic data on race, ethnicity, gender and age.
(6) After the initial audit and financial  review under subsection (4) of this section, the
division shall conduct periodic performance audits and financial reviews pursuant  to the
division’s annual audit plan and taking into consideration the risks of the program.
STATEMENT OF ECONOMIC INTEREST
SECTION 23.
 ORS 244.050 is amended to read:
244.050. (1) On or before April 15 of each year the following persons shall file with  the Oregon
Government  Ethics  Commission a verified statement of economic interest as required under this
chapter:
(a) The Governor, Secretary  of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner of the
Bureau of Labor and Industries, district attorneys and members of the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Any judicial officer, including justices of the peace and municipal  judges, except any pro tem
judicial officer who does not otherwise serve as a judicial officer.
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 17
(c) Any candidate for a public office designated in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(d) The Deputy Attorney General.
(e) The Deputy Secretary of State.
(f) The Legislative Administrator, the Legislative Counsel, the Legislative Fiscal Officer,  the
Legislative Policy and Research Director,  the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the House
of Representatives and the Legislative Equity Officer.
(g) The president  and vice presidents, or their administrative equivalents, in each public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002.
(h) The following state officers:
(A) Adjutant General.
(B) Director of Agriculture.
(C) Manager of State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(D) Water Resources Director.
(E) Director of Department of Environmental Quality.
(F) Director of Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(G) State Fish and Wildlife Director.
(H) State Forester.
(I) State Geologist.
(J) Director of Human Services.
(K) Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(L) Director of the Department of State Lands.
(M) State Librarian.
(N) Administrator of Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
(O) Superintendent of State Police.
(P) Director of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(Q) Director of Department of Revenue.
(R) Director of Transportation.
(S) Public Utility Commissioner.
(T) Director of Veterans’ Affairs.
(U) Executive director of Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(V) Director of the State Department of Energy.
(W) Director and each assistant director of the Oregon State Lottery.
(X) Director of the Department of Corrections.
(Y) Director of the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(Z) Executive director of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(AA) Director of the Oregon Business Development Department.
(BB) Director of the Office of Emergency Management.
(CC) Director of the Employment Department.
(DD) Chief of staff for the Governor.
(EE) Director of the Housing and Community Services Department.
(FF) State Court Administrator.
(GG) Director of the Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(HH) Board chairperson of the Land Use Board of Appeals.
(II) State Marine Director.
(JJ) Executive director of the Oregon Racing Commission.
(KK) State Parks and Recreation Director.
(LL) Public defense services executive director.
(MM) Chairperson of the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(NN) Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(OO) Executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(PP) Executive director of the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board.
(QQ) Director of the Oregon Youth Authority.
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 18
(RR) Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
(SS) Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(i) The First Partner, the legal counsel, the  deputy legal counsel and all policy advisors within
the Governor’s office.
(j) Every elected city or county official.
(k) Every member of a city or county planning, zoning or development commission.
(L) The chief executive officer of a city or county who performs the  duties of manager or prin-
cipal administrator of the city or county.
(m) Members of local government boundary commissions formed under ORS 199.410 to 199.519.
(n) Every member of a governing body of a metropolitan  service district and the auditor and
executive officer thereof.
(o) Each member of the board of directors of the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(p) The chief administrative officer and the financial officer  of each common and union high
school district, education service district and community college district.
(q) Every member of the following state boards , [ and] commissions  and councils :
(A) Governing board of the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries.
(B) Oregon Business Development Commission.
(C) State Board of Education.
(D) Environmental Quality Commission.
(E) Fish and Wildlife Commission of the State of Oregon.
(F) State Board of Forestry.
(G) Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(H) Oregon Health Policy Board.
(I) Oregon Investment Council.
(J) Land Conservation and Development Commission.
(K) Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
(L) Oregon Short Term Fund Board.
(M) State Marine Board.
(N) Mass transit district boards.
(O) Energy Facility Siting Council.
(P) Board of Commissioners of the Port of Portland.
(Q) Employment Relations Board.
(R) Public Employees Retirement Board.
(S) Oregon Racing Commission.
(T) Oregon Transportation Commission.
(U) Water Resources Commission.
(V) Workers’ Compensation Board.
(W) Oregon Facilities Authority.
(X) Oregon State Lottery Commission.
(Y) Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council.
(Z) Columbia River Gorge Commission.
(AA) Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors.
(BB) Capitol Planning Commission.
(CC) Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(DD) Oregon Growth Board.
(EE) Early Learning Council.
(FF) The Oversight and Accountability Council.
(r) The following officers of the State Treasurer:
(A) Deputy State Treasurer.
(B) Chief of staff for the office of the State Treasurer.
(C) Director of the Investment Division.
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 19
(s) Every member of the board of commissioners of a port governed by ORS 777.005 to  777.725
or 777.915 to 777.953.
(t) Every member of  the board of directors of an authority created under ORS 441.525 to 441.595.
(u) Every member of a governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(v) Every  member of the board of directors of an authority created under ORS 465.600 to
465.621.
(2) By  April 15 next after the date an appointment takes effect, every appointed public official
on a board or  commission listed in subsection (1) of this section shall file with the Oregon Govern-
ment Ethics Commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS 244.060, 244.070
and 244.090.
(3) By April 15 next after the filing deadline for the primary election, each candidate described
in subsection (1) of this section shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest as
required under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(4) Not later than the 40th day before the date of the statewide general  election, each candidate
described in subsection (1) of  this section who will appear on the statewide general election ballot
and who was not required to file a  statement of economic interest under subsections (1) to (3) of this
section shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS
244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(5) Subsections (1) to (3) of  this section apply only to persons who are incumbent, elected or
appointed public officials as of April 15 and to persons who are candidates on April 15.
(6) If a statement required to be filed under this section has not been received  by the commis-
sion within five days after the date the statement is due,  the commission shall notify the public of-
ficial or candidate and give the public official or candidate not less than 15 days to comply  with the
requirements of this section. If the public official or candidate fails to comply by the date set  by the
commission, the commission may impose a civil penalty as provided in ORS 244.350.
REPORT TO LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY
SECTION 24.
No later than January 1, 2022, and at the beginning of each calendar quar-
ter thereafter, the Oregon Health Authority shall report to the Legislative Assembly, in  the
manner provided in ORS 192.245, how funds from the Drug Treatment and Recovery  Services
Fund were spent in the preceding calendar quarter.
SECTION 24a. The Oregon Health Authority shall report, in the manner provided in ORS
192.245, to the interim subcommittee  of the Joint Committee on Ways and Means related to
human services and to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to mental
or behavioral health:
(1) No later than January 31, 2022, the number of applications  for grants or funding
awarded under section 2, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot  Measure 110 (2020)), and, for
each award, the:
(a) Amount of the grant or funding;
(b) Array of services provided by each recipient;
(c) Duration of the award; and
(d) Geographic area served by each recipient.
(2) No later than 30 days after grants or funding  have been awarded to entities serving
every county in this state:
(a) The name of each  recipient of a grant or funding providing services described in
section 2  (2)(d), chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), and any subcon-
tractors of the recipient; and
(b) The services provided by each recipient and the counties where the services will  be
provided by the recipient.
(3) No later than 30 days after the grants or funding have been  awarded for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2021:
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 20
(a) Details of the awards;
(b) The grants or funding awarded for services described  in section 2 (2), chapter 2,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)),  and the grants or funding that were awarded
to provide services described in section 2 (3), chapter 2,  Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure
110 (2020)); and
(c) Total budget projections for the biennia beginning July 1, 2021, and July 1, 2023.
JUVENILE COURTS
SECTION 25.
 ORS 419C.370 is amended to read:
419C.370. (1) The juvenile court may enter an order directing that all cases involving:
(a) Violation of a law or ordinance relating to the use or operation of a  motor vehicle, boating
laws or game laws be waived to criminal or municipal court;
(b) An offense classified as a violation other than a Class E violation  under the laws of  this
state or a political subdivision of this state be waived  to municipal court if the municipal court has
agreed to accept jurisdiction; and
(c) A misdemeanor that entails theft, destruction, tampering with or vandalism of property  be
waived to municipal court if the municipal court has agreed to accept jurisdiction.
(2) Cases waived under subsection (1) of this section are subject to the following:
(a) That the criminal or municipal court  prior to hearing a case, other than a case involving a
parking violation, in which the  defendant is or appears to be under 18 years of age notify the ju-
venile court of that fact; and
(b) That the juvenile court may direct that any such case be waived  to the juvenile court for
further proceedings.
(3)(a) When a person who  has been waived under subsection (1)(c) of this section is convicted
of a property offense, the municipal court  may impose any sanction authorized for the offense except
for incarceration. The municipal court shall notify the juvenile court of the disposition of the case.
(b) When a person has been waived  under subsection (1) of this section and fails to appear as
summoned or is placed on probation and is alleged to have  violated a condition of the probation, the
juvenile court may recall the case to the juvenile court for  further proceedings. When a person has
been returned to juvenile court under this  paragraph, the juvenile court may proceed as though the
person had failed to appear  as summoned to the juvenile court or had violated a juvenile court
probation order under ORS 419C.446.
(4) Records of cases waived under subsection (1)(c) of  this section are juvenile records for pur-
poses of expunction under ORS 419A.260.
SECTION 26.
Section 27 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 419C.
SECTION 27. (1) If a youth is within the jurisdiction of the court for  having committed
an act that, if committed by an adult,  would constitute a Class E violation, the court shall
proceed in accordance with section 22, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot  Measure 110
(2020)).
(2) Nothing in subsection (1) of this section prevents a youth from entering into a formal
accountability agreement under ORS 419C.230 for a Class E violation.
MUNICIPAL AND JUSTICE COURTS
SECTION 28.  ORS 51.050 is amended to read:
51.050. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section,  in addition to the criminal jurisdiction
of justice courts already conferred upon and exercised by them, justice  courts have jurisdiction of
all offenses committed or triable in their respective counties. The jurisdiction conveyed  by this
section is concurrent with any jurisdiction that may be exercised by a circuit  court or municipal
court.
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 21
(2) In any justice court that has not become a court of record  under ORS 51.025, a defendant
charged with a misdemeanor shall be notified immediately after entering a plea of not guilty of  the
right of the defendant to have  the matter transferred to the circuit court for the county where the
justice court is located. The election shall be made within 10 days after  the plea of not guilty is
entered, and the justice shall immediately transfer the case to the appropriate court.
(3) A justice court does  not have jurisdiction over the trial of any felony or a designated drug-
related misdemeanor as defined  in ORS 423.478. A justice court does not have jurisdiction over
Class E violations.  Except as provided in ORS  51.037, a justice court does not have jurisdiction
over offenses created by the charter or ordinance of any city.
SECTION 29.  ORS 221.339 is amended to read:
221.339. (1) A municipal court has concurrent jurisdiction with circuit  courts and justice courts
over all violations committed or triable in the city where the court is located.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, municipal courts have concur-
rent jurisdiction with circuit courts and justice courts over misdemeanors  committed or triable in
the city. Municipal courts may exercise the jurisdiction conveyed by this section without a  charter
provision or ordinance authorizing that exercise.
(3) Municipal courts  have no jurisdiction over felonies , [ or] designated drug-related
misdemeanors as defined in ORS 423.478  or Class E violations .
(4) A city may limit the exercise of jurisdiction over  misdemeanors by a municipal court under
this section  by the adoption of a charter provision or ordinance, except that municipal courts must
retain concurrent jurisdiction with circuit courts over:
(a) Misdemeanors created by the city’s own  charter or by ordinances adopted by the city, as
provided in ORS 3.132; and
(b) Traffic crimes as defined by ORS 801.545.
(5) Subject to the powers and  duties of the Attorney General under ORS 180.060, the city at-
torney has authority to prosecute a violation of any offense created by statute that is subject to  the
jurisdiction of a municipal court, including any appeal, if the offense is  committed or triable in the
city. The prosecution shall be in the name of the state. The city attorney shall have all powers of
a district attorney in prosecutions under this subsection.
SECTION 30.
Notwithstanding the amendments to ORS 51.050 and 221.339 by sections 28
and 29 of this 2021 Act:
(1) A municipal court or justice court with Class E violation proceeding pending  before
the court on the effective date of this  2021 Act may continue to exercise jurisdiction over
the proceeding in accordance  with section 22, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure
110 (2020)).
(2) A judgment of a  municipal court or justice court adjudicating a Class E violation prior
to the effective date of this 2021 Act is validated.
CRIMINAL FINE ACCOUNT
SECTION 31.  ORS 137.300 is amended to read:
137.300. (1) The Criminal Fine Account is established in the General  Fund. Except as otherwise
provided by law, all amounts collected  in state courts as monetary obligations in criminal actions
shall be deposited by the courts  in the account. All moneys in the account are continuously appro-
priated to the Department of Revenue to  be distributed by the Department of Revenue as provided
in this section. The  Department of Revenue shall keep a record of moneys transferred into and out
of the account.
(2) The Legislative  Assembly shall first allocate moneys from the Criminal Fine Account for the
following purposes, in the following order of priority:
(a) Allocations for public safety standards, training and facilities.
(b) Allocations  for criminal injuries compensation and assistance to victims of crime and chil-
dren reasonably suspected of being victims of crime.
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 22
(c) Allocations for the forensic services provided by the Oregon State Police, including,  but not
limited to, services of the Chief Medical Examiner.
(d) Allocations for the maintenance and operation of the Law Enforcement Data System.
(3) After making allocations under subsection (2) of this section, the Legislative Assembly shall
allocate moneys from the Criminal Fine Account for the following purposes:
(a) Allocations to the Law Enforcement Medical Liability  Account established under ORS
414.815.
(b) Allocations to the State Court Facilities and Security Account established under  ORS 1.178.
(c) Allocations to the Department of Corrections for the purpose  of planning, operating and
maintaining county  juvenile and adult corrections programs and facilities and drug and alcohol
programs.
(d) Allocations to the Oregon Health  Authority for the purpose of grants under ORS 430.345 for
the establishment, operation and maintenance of alcohol and drug abuse prevention,  early inter-
vention and treatment services provided through a county.
(e) Allocations to the Oregon State Police  for the purpose of the enforcement of the laws re-
lating to driving under the influence of intoxicants.
(f) Allocations to the Arrest and Return Account established under ORS 133.865.
(g) Allocations to the Intoxicated Driver Program Fund established under ORS 813.270.
(h) Allocations to the State Court Technology Fund established under ORS 1.012.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the Legislative Assembly shall
allocate all moneys deposited into the Criminal Fine Account as payment of fines on  Class
E violations to the Drug  Treatment and Recovery Services Fund established under section
5, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)).
[(4)] (5)  It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly that allocations from the Criminal Fine
Account under subsection (3) of this section be consistent with historical funding of the entities,
programs and accounts listed in subsection (3) of this section from monetary obligations  imposed in
criminal proceedings. Amounts that are  allocated under subsection (3)(c) of this section shall be
distributed to counties based  on the amounts that were transferred to counties by circuit courts
during the 2009-2011 biennium under the provisions of ORS 137.308, as in effect January 1, 2011.
[(5)] (6)  Moneys in the Criminal Fine Account may not be allocated for the payment of  debt
service obligations.
[(6)] (7)  The Department of Revenue shall deposit in the General Fund all moneys remaining in
the Criminal Fine Account after the  distributions listed in subsections (2) , [ and] (3)  and (4)  of this
section have been made.
[(7)] (8) The Department of Revenue shall establish by  rule a process for distributing moneys in
the Criminal Fine Account. The department may not distribute more than one-eighth  of the total
biennial allocation to an entity during a calendar quarter.
UNIFORM CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES ACT CHANGES
SECTION 32.
 ORS 475.752, as amended by section 11, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)), is amended to read:
475.752. (1) Except as authorized by ORS 475.005 to  475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980, it is unlawful
for any person  to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance. Any person who violates this sub-
section with respect to:
(a) A controlled substance in Schedule I, is guilty of a Class A felony, except as otherwise pro-
vided in ORS 475.886 and 475.890.
(b) A controlled substance in Schedule  II, is guilty of a Class B felony, except as otherwise
provided in ORS 475.878, 475.880, 475.882, 475.904 and 475.906.
(c) A controlled substance in Schedule III, is guilty of a Class C felony, except as otherwise
provided in ORS 475.904 and 475.906.
(d) A controlled substance in Schedule IV, is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 23
(e) A controlled substance in Schedule V, is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
(2) Except as authorized in ORS  475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980, it is unlawful for any
person to create or deliver a counterfeit substance. Any person who violates this subsection  with
respect  to:
(a) A counterfeit substance in Schedule I, is guilty of a Class A felony.
(b) A counterfeit substance in Schedule II, is guilty of a Class B felony.
(c) A counterfeit substance in Schedule III, is guilty of a Class C felony.
(d) A counterfeit substance in Schedule IV, is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.
(e) A counterfeit substance in Schedule V, is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
(3) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally  to possess a controlled substance
unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to a valid prescription or order of, a
practitioner while acting in  the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized
by ORS 475.005 to 475.285  and 475.752 to 475.980. Any person who violates this subsection with re-
spect to:
(a) A  controlled substance in Schedule I, is guilty of a Class E violation, except as otherwise
provided in ORS 475.854, 475.874 and 475.894 and subsection (7) of this section.
(b) A controlled substance  in Schedule II, is guilty of a Class E violation, except as otherwise
provided in ORS  475.814, 475.824, 475.834 or 475.884 or subsection (8) of this section.
(c) A controlled substance in Schedule III, is guilty of a Class E violation.
(d) A controlled substance in Schedule IV, is guilty of a Class E violation.
(e) A controlled substance in Schedule V, is guilty of a violation.
(4) It is an affirmative defense  in any prosecution under this section for manufacture, pos-
session or delivery of [ that] the  plant of the genus Lophophora commonly known as peyote[ , it is
an affirmative defense ] that the peyote is being used or is intended for use:
(a) In connection with the good faith practice of a religious belief;
(b) As directly associated with a religious practice; and
(c) In a manner that is not  dangerous to the health of the user or others who are in the prox-
imity of the user.
(5) The affirmative defense created in subsection (4) of this section is not available to any person
who has  possessed or delivered the peyote while incarcerated in a correctional facility in this state.
(6)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a  person who unlawfully manufactures or
delivers  a  controlled substance in Schedule IV and who thereby causes death to another person is
guilty of a Class C felony.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, causation is established when the  controlled substance plays
a substantial role in the death of the other person.
[(7)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a) of this section, unlawful possession of  a controlled sub-
stance in Schedule I is a Class B felony if the possession is  a commercial drug offense under ORS
475.900 (1)(b).]
[(b) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a)  of this section and except as provided in ORS 475.900 (1)(b),
unlawful possession of a controlled substance in Schedule I is a Class A misdemeanor  if the person
possesses: ]
[(A) Forty or more user units of  a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of lysergic
acid diethylamide; or ]
[(B) Twelve grams or more of a mixture  or substance containing a detectable amount of psilocybin
or psilocin. ]
(7) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a) of this section:
(a) Unlawful possession of a controlled substance in Schedule I is a Class  A misdemeanor
if the person possesses:
(A) Forty or more user  units of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount
of lysergic acid diethylamide; or
(B) Twelve grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a  detectable amount of
psilocybin or psilocin.
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 24
(b) Unlawful possession of a controlled substance in Schedule I is a Class B felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (2)(b).
(8) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(b) of this section, unlawful possession of  a controlled sub-
stance in Schedule II is a Class C felony if :
(a) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b)[ .]; or
(b) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (2)(b).
SECTION 33.
 ORS 475.814 is amended to read:
475.814. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or  intentionally to possess hydrocodone
unless the hydrocodone was obtained directly from, or pursuant to[ ,] a  valid prescription or order
of, a practitioner while acting in the course  of professional practice, or except as otherwise au-
thorized by ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of hydrocodone is a [ Class A misdemeanor ] Class E violation .
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession of hydrocodone
is a Class A misdemeanor if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses 40 or more  pills, tablets, capsules or user units of a mixture
or substance containing a detectable amount of hydrocodone.
SECTION 34.
 ORS 475.824, as amended by section 12, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)), is amended to read:
475.824. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or  intentionally to possess methadone unless
the methadone was obtained directly from, or pursuant to[ ,] a valid prescription or order of , a
practitioner while acting in  the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized
by ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of methadone is a Class E violation.
[(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession of methadone is a  Class
C felony if the possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b). ]
[(c) Notwithstanding paragraph  (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession of methadone is a Class
A misdemeanor if  the person possesses 40 or more user units of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of methadone. ]
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)  of this subsection, unlawful possession of methadone
is a Class A misdemeanor if the person possesses 40 or more user units of a  mixture or
substance containing a detectable amount of methadone.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a)  and (b) of this subsection, unlawful possession of
methadone is a Class C felony if the possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS
475.900 (1)(b).
SECTION 35.
 ORS 475.834, as amended by section 13, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)), is amended to read:
475.834. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess oxycodone  unless
the oxycodone was obtained directly  from, or pursuant to[ ,] a valid prescription or order of , a
practitioner while acting in  the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized
by ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of oxycodone is a Class E violation.
[(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection, unlawful possession of oxycodone is a Class
C felony if the possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b). ]
[(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful  possession of oxycodone is a Class
A misdemeanor if the person possesses  40 or more pills, tablets or capsules of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of oxycodone. ]
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)  of this subsection, unlawful possession of oxycodone
is a Class A misdemeanor if the person possesses 40  or more pills, tablets, capsules or user
units of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of oxycodone.
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 25
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a)  and (b) of this subsection, unlawful possession of
oxycodone is a Class C felony if the possession is a  commercial drug offense under ORS
475.900 (1)(b).
SECTION 36.  ORS 475.854, as amended by section 14, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021  (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)), is amended to read:
475.854. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess heroin.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of heroin is a Class E violation.
[(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this  subsection, unlawful possession of heroin is a Class B
felony if the possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b). ]
[(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection and except as provided in ORS 475.900 (1)(b),
unlawful possession of heroin is a Class A misdemeanor if the  person possesses one gram or more of
a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of heroin. ]
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  unlawful possession of heroin is a
Class A misdemeanor if the person possesses one gram or  more of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of heroin.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a)  and (b) of this subsection, unlawful possession of
heroin is a Class B felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (2)(b).
SECTION 37.
 ORS 475.874, as amended by section 15, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021  (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)), is amended to read:
475.874. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to  possess
3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine is a Class E violation.
[(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession of
3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine is a Class B felony if the possession is  a commercial drug offense
under ORS 475.900 (1)(b). ]
[(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection and except as provided in ORS 475.900 (1)(b),
unlawful possession of methylenedioxymethamphetamine is a  Class A misdemeanor if the person pos-
sesses one gram or more or five  or more pills, tablets or capsules of a mixture or substance containing
a detectable amount of: ]
[(A) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine; ]
[(B) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine; or ]
[(C) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine.]
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection, unlawful possession of
3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine is a Class A misdemeanor if the  person possesses one
gram or more or five or more pills, tablets or  capsules of a mixture or substance containing
a detectable amount of:
(A) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
(B) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine; or
(C) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection,  unlawful possession of
3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine is a Class B felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (2)(b).
SECTION 38.
 ORS 475.884, as amended by section 16, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)), is amended to read:
475.884. (1) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess cocaine  unless
the substance was obtained directly  from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a practi-
tioner while acting in the course of professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by ORS
475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of cocaine is a Class E violation.
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 26
[(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful  possession of cocaine is a Class
C felony if the possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b). ]
[(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection and except as provided in ORS 475.900 (1)(b),
unlawful possession of cocaine is  a Class A misdemeanor if the person possesses two grams or more
of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of cocaine. ]
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession of cocaine  is a
Class A misdemeanor if the person possesses  two grams or more of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of cocaine.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a)  and (b) of this subsection, unlawful possession of
cocaine is a Class C felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (2)(b).
SECTION 39.
 ORS 475.894, as amended by section 17, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021  (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)), is amended to read:
475.894. (1) It is unlawful  for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess methamphetamine
unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a
practitioner while acting in the course of professional practice, or except  as otherwise authorized
by ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
(2)(a) Unlawful possession of methamphetamine is a Class E violation.
[(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful  possession of methamphetamine is
a Class C felony if the possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b). ]
[(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection and except as provided in ORS 475.900 (1)(b),
unlawful possession of methamphetamine is a Class A misdemeanor if the  person possesses two grams
or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of methamphetamine. ]
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, unlawful possession  of metham-
phetamine is a Class A misdemeanor if the  person possesses two grams or more of a mixture
or substance containing a detectable amount of methamphetamine.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a)  and (b) of this subsection, unlawful possession of
methamphetamine is a Class C felony if:
(A) The possession is a commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b); or
(B) The person possesses a substantial quantity under ORS 475.900 (2)(b).
SECTION 40.
 ORS 475.900 is amended to read:
475.900. (1)  A violation of ORS 475.752, 475.806 to 475.894, 475.904 or 475.906 shall be classified
as crime category 8 of the  sentencing guidelines grid of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission if:
(a) The violation constitutes delivery or manufacture of a controlled  substance and involves
substantial quantities  of a controlled substance. For purposes of this paragraph, the following
amounts constitute substantial quantities of the following controlled substances:
(A) Five grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of heroin;
(B) Five grams or  more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
fentanyl, or any substituted derivative of fentanyl as defined by the rules of the  Oregon
Board of Pharmacy;
[(B)] (C)  Ten grams  or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
cocaine;
[(C)] (D)  Ten grams or more of a mixture or substance containing  a detectable amount of
methamphetamine, its salts, isomers or salts of its isomers;
[(D)] (E)  Two hundred or more user units of a mixture or substance containing a  detectable
amount of lysergic acid diethylamide;
[(E)] (F)  Sixty grams or more of a mixture or substance  containing a detectable amount of
psilocybin or psilocin; or
[(F)] (G)  Five grams or more or 25 or more pills, tablets or  capsules of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of:
(i) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 27
(ii) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine; or
(iii) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine.
(b) The violation constitutes possession, delivery or manufacture of a controlled substance  and
the possession, delivery  or manufacture is a commercial drug offense. A possession, delivery or
manufacture is a commercial drug offense for purposes of this subsection if it is accompanied by at
least three of the following factors:
(A) The delivery was of heroin,  cocaine, methamphetamine, lysergic acid diethylamide,
psilocybin or psilocin and was for consideration;
(B) The offender was in possession of $300 or more in cash;
(C) The offender was unlawfully in possession of a firearm or other weapon as described in  ORS
166.270 (2), or the offender used, attempted to use or threatened to use a deadly or dangerous
weapon as defined in ORS 161.015, or the offender was in possession of  a firearm or other deadly
or dangerous weapon as defined in  ORS 161.015 for the purpose of using it in connection with a
controlled substance offense;
(D) The offender was  in possession of materials being used for the packaging of controlled sub-
stances such as scales, wrapping or foil, other  than the material being used to contain the substance
that is the subject of the offense;
(E) The offender was in possession of drug transaction records or customer lists;
(F) The offender was in possession of stolen property;
(G) Modification of structures by painting, wiring, plumbing or lighting to facilitate a controlled
substance  offense;
(H) The offender was  in possession of manufacturing paraphernalia, including recipes, precursor
chemicals, laboratory equipment, lighting, ventilating or power generating equipment;
(I) The offender was using public lands for the manufacture of controlled substances;
(J) The offender had  constructed fortifications or had taken security measures with the potential
of injuring persons; or
(K) The offender was in possession of controlled substances in an amount greater than:
(i) Three grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of heroin;
(ii) Three grams or more of a mixture or substance containing  a detectable amount of
fentanyl, or any substituted derivative of fentanyl as defined by the rules of the  Oregon
Board of Pharmacy;
[(ii)] (iii)  Eight grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
cocaine;
[(iii)] (iv)  Eight grams or more of  a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
methamphetamine;
[(iv)] (v)  Twenty or more user units of a mixture or substance containing a detectable  amount
of lysergic acid diethylamide;
[(v)] (vi)  Ten grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount  of
psilocybin or psilocin; or
[(vi)] (vii) Four grams or more or 20 or more pills, tablets or capsules of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of:
(I) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
(II) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine; or
(III) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine.
(c) The violation constitutes a violation of ORS  475.848, 475.852, 475.868, 475.872, 475.878,
475.882, 475.888, 475.892 or 475.904.
(d) The  violation constitutes manufacturing methamphetamine and the manufacturing consists
of:
(A) A chemical reaction involving  one or more precursor substances for the purpose of manu-
facturing methamphetamine; or
(B) Grinding, soaking or otherwise breaking down a precursor  substance for the purpose of
manufacturing methamphetamine.
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 28
(e) The violation constitutes a violation of ORS 475.906 (1) or (2) that is not described in  ORS
475.907.
(2) A violation of ORS 475.752 or 475.806 to 475.894 shall be classified as  crime category 6 of
the sentencing guidelines grid of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission if:
(a) The violation constitutes  delivery of heroin, cocaine, methamphetamine or
3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine, 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine or
3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine and is for consideration.
(b) The violation constitutes possession of  substantial  quantities of a controlled substance.
For purposes of this paragraph, the following amounts constitute substantial quantities  of
the following controlled substances :
(A) Five grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of heroin;
(B) Five grams or  more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
fentanyl, or any substituted derivative of fentanyl as defined by the rules of the  Oregon
Board of Pharmacy;
[(B)] (C)  Ten grams  or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
cocaine;
[(C)] (D)  Ten grams or more of a mixture or substance containing  a detectable amount of
methamphetamine;
[(D)] (E)  Two hundred or more user units of a mixture or substance containing a  detectable
amount of lysergic acid diethylamide;
[(E)] (F)  Sixty grams or more of a mixture or substance  containing a detectable amount of
psilocybin or psilocin; or
[(F)] (G)  Five grams or more or 25 or more pills, tablets or  capsules of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of:
(i) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
(ii) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine; or
(iii) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine.
(3) Any felony  violation of ORS 475.752 or 475.806 to 475.894 not contained in subsection (1) or
(2) of this section shall be classified as[ :]
[(a)] crime category 4 of the sentencing guidelines grid of the Oregon  Criminal Justice Com-
mission if the violation involves delivery or manufacture of a controlled substance .[; or ]
[(b) Crime category 1  of the sentencing guidelines grid of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission
if the violation involves possession of a controlled substance. ]
(4) In order to prove a commercial drug offense, the state  shall plead in the accusatory instru-
ment sufficient factors of a commercial drug offense under  subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
The state has the burden of proving each factor beyond a reasonable doubt.
(5) As used in this section, “mixture or  substance” means any mixture or substance, whether
or not the mixture or substance is in an ingestible or marketable form at the time of the offense.
SECTION 41.
 ORS 475.925 is amended to read:
475.925. When a person is convicted of the  unlawful delivery or manufacture of a controlled
substance, the court shall sentence the person to a term of incarceration ranging from:
(1) 58 months to 130 months, depending on the person’s criminal history, if the delivery  or
manufacture involves:
(a) 500 grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of cocaine;
(b) 500 grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of  metham-
phetamine, its salts, isomers or salts of its isomers;
(c) 100 grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of heroin; [ or]
(d) 100 grams or more of a mixture or  substance containing a detectable amount of
fentanyl, or  any substituted derivative of fentanyl as defined by the rules of the Oregon
Board of Pharmacy; or
[(d)] (e)  100 grams or more or 500 or more pills, tablets or capsules of a mixture or  substance
containing a detectable amount of ecstasy.
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 29
(2) 34 months to 72 months, depending on  the person’s criminal history, if the delivery or man-
ufacture  involves:
(a) 100 grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of cocaine;
(b) 100  grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of metham-
phetamine, its salts, isomers or salts of its isomers;
(c) 50 grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of heroin; [ or]
(d) 50 grams or more  of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
fentanyl, or any substituted derivative of fentanyl as defined by the rules of the  Oregon
Board of Pharmacy; or
[(d)] (e)  50 grams  or more or 250 or more pills, tablets or capsules of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of ecstasy.
SECTION 42.
 ORS 475.235 is amended to read:
475.235. (1)  It is not necessary for the state to negate any exemption or exception in ORS
475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980 in any complaint,  information, indictment or other pleading
or in any trial, hearing or other proceeding under ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980.
The burden of proof of any exemption or exception is upon the person claiming it.
(2) In the absence of proof that a person is the duly authorized  holder of an appropriate regis-
tration or order form issued  under ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980, the person is
presumed not  to be the holder of the registration or form. The burden of proof is upon the person
to rebut the presumption.
(3)(a) When a controlled substance is at issue in a criminal proceeding before a grand jury, at
a preliminary hearing, in a proceeding on a district attorney’s  information , during a proceeding
on a Class E violation  or for purposes of an early disposition program, it is prima facie evidence
of the identity of the controlled substance if:
(A) A sample of the controlled substance is tested using a presumptive test for controlled sub-
stances;
(B) The test is conducted by a  law enforcement officer trained to use the test or by a forensic
scientist;  and
(C) The test is positive for the particular controlled substance.
(b) When the identity of a controlled substance  is established using a presumptive test for pur-
poses of a criminal proceeding before a grand jury, a preliminary hearing,  a proceeding on a district
attorney’s  information  or an early disposition program, the defendant, upon notice to the district
attorney, may request that the  controlled substance be sent to a state police forensic laboratory for
analysis. The defendant may not make a request under this paragraph concerning a  con-
trolled substance at issue in a proceeding on a Class E violation.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, in all prosecutions in which an analysis of a
controlled substance or  sample was conducted, a certified copy of the analytical report signed by
the director of a state police forensic laboratory or the analyst or forensic scientist conducting  the
analysis shall be admitted as prima facie evidence of the results of  the analytical findings unless the
defendant has provided notice of an objection in accordance with subsection (5) of this section.
(5) If the defendant intends to object at  trial to the admission of a certified copy of an analytical
report as provided in subsection (4) of this section, not less than 15 days  prior to trial the defendant
shall file written notice of the objection with the court and serve a copy on the district attorney.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) “Analyst” means a person employed by the Department of State Police to  conduct analysis
in forensic laboratories established by the department under ORS 181A.150.
(b) “Presumptive test” includes,  but is not limited to, chemical tests using Marquis reagent,
Duquenois-Levine reagent, Scott reagent system or modified Chen’s reagent.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 43.
 ORS 161.570 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 30
161.570. (1) As used in this section, “nonperson felony” has the meaning given  that term in the
rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(2) A district attorney may elect to treat a Class C  nonperson felony or a violation of ORS
475.752 (7)(b), 475.854 [ (2)(b)] (2)(c)  or 475.874  [(2)(b)] (2)(c) as a Class A misdemeanor. The election
must be made by the district attorney orally or  in writing at the time of the first appearance of the
defendant. If a district attorney elects to treat a Class  C felony or a violation of ORS 475.752
(7)(b), 475.854 [(2)(b)] (2)(c) or 475.874 [ (2)(b)] (2)(c) as a Class A misdemeanor under this subsection,
the court shall amend the accusatory instrument to reflect the charged offense as a Class  A
misdemeanor.
(3) If, at some time after the first appearance of a defendant charged with a Class C  nonperson
felony or a violation of ORS 475.752 (7) (b), 475.854 [(2)(b)] (2)(c) or 475.874  [(2)(b)] (2)(c), the district
attorney and the defendant agree to treat the charged offense as a Class A misdemeanor,  the court
may allow the offense to be treated as a Class A misdemeanor by stipulation of the parties.
(4) If a Class  C felony or a violation of ORS 475.752 (7) (b), 475.854 [ (2)(b)] (2)(c)  or 475.874
[(2)(b)] (2)(c)  is  treated as a Class A misdemeanor under this section, the court shall clearly de-
nominate the offense as a Class A misdemeanor in any judgment entered in the matter.
(5) If no election or stipulation is made under this section, the case proceeds as a felony.
(6) Before a district attorney may make  an election under subsection (2) of this section, the
district attorney shall adopt written  guidelines for determining when and under what circumstances
the election may be made. The district attorney shall apply the guidelines uniformly.
(7) Notwithstanding ORS 161.635, the fine that a court may impose  upon conviction of a
misdemeanor under this section may not:
(a) Be less than the minimum fine established by ORS 137.286 for a felony; or
(b) Exceed the amount provided  in ORS 161.625 for the class of felony receiving Class A
misdemeanor treatment.
SECTION 44.
 ORS 423.478, as amended by section 20, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021  (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)), is amended to read:
423.478. (1) The Department of Corrections shall:
(a) Operate prisons for offenders sentenced to terms of incarceration for more than 12 months;
(b) Provide central information and data services sufficient to:
(A) Allow tracking of offenders; and
(B) Permit analysis of correlations  between sanctions, supervision, services and programs, and
future criminal conduct; and
(c) Provide interstate compact administration and jail inspections.
(2) Subject to  ORS 423.483, [ the] a county, in partnership with the department, shall assume re-
sponsibility for community-based supervision, sanctions and services for  offenders convicted of felo-
nies or designated drug-related misdemeanors who are:
(a) On parole;
(b) On probation;
(c) On post-prison supervision;
(d) Sentenced, on or after January 1, 1997, to 12 months or less incarceration;
(e) Sanctioned, on or after  January 1, 1997, by a court or the State Board of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision to 12 months or less incarceration for violation of a condition of  parole, pro-
bation or post-prison supervision; or
(f) On conditional release under ORS 420A.206.
(3) Notwithstanding  the fact that the court has sentenced a person to a term of incarceration,
when an offender is committed to the custody of the supervisory authority of a county under  ORS
137.124 (2) or  (4), the supervisory authority may execute the sentence by imposing sanctions other
than incarceration if deemed appropriate by the  supervisory authority. If the supervisory authority
releases a person from custody under this subsection and  the person is required to report as a sex
offender under ORS 163A.010,  the supervisory authority, as a condition of release, shall order the
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 31
person to report to the Department of State Police, a city police department or  a county sheriff’s
office or to the supervising agency, if any:
(a) When the person is released;
(b) Within 10 days of a change of residence;
(c) Once each year within 10 days of the person’s birth date;
(d) Within 10 days of the first day the person works at, carries  on a vocation at or attends an
institution of higher education; and
(e) Within 10 days of a change in work, vocation or  attendance status at an institution of higher
education.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Attends,” “institution of higher education,” “works” and “carries on a vocation” have  the
meanings given those terms in ORS 163A.005.
(b) “Designated drug-related misdemeanor” means:
(A) Unlawful possession of methadone under ORS 475.824 [ (2)(c)] (2)(b);
(B) Unlawful possession of oxycodone under ORS 475.834 [ (2)(c)] (2)(b);
(C) Unlawful possession of heroin under ORS 475.854 [ (2)(c)] (2)(b);
(D) Unlawful possession of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine under ORS  475.874 [(2)(c)]
(2)(b);
(E) Unlawful possession of cocaine under ORS 475.884 [ (2)(c)] (2)(b); or
(F) Unlawful possession of methamphetamine under ORS 475.894 [ (2)(c)] (2)(b).
SECTION 44a.
If Senate Bill 497 becomes law, section  3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill  497) (amending ORS 423.478), is repealed and ORS 423.478, as amended
by section 20, chapter 2,  Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), and section 44 of this
2021 Act, is amended to read:
423.478. (1) The Department of Corrections shall:
(a) Operate prisons for offenders sentenced to terms of incarceration for more than 12 months;
(b) Provide central information and data services sufficient to:
(A) Allow tracking of offenders; and
(B) Permit analysis of correlations  between sanctions, supervision, services and programs, and
future criminal conduct; and
(c) Provide interstate compact administration and jail inspections.
(2) Subject to ORS 423.483, [ a] each  county, in partnership with  the department, shall assume
responsibility for community-based  supervision, sanctions and services for offenders convicted of
felonies , [ or] designated drug-related misdemeanors  or designated person misdemeanors  who are:
(a) On parole;
(b) On probation;
(c) On post-prison supervision;
(d) Sentenced, on or after January 1, 1997, to 12 months or less incarceration;
(e) Sanctioned, on or after  January 1, 1997, by a court or the State Board of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision to 12 months or less incarceration for violation of a condition of  parole, pro-
bation or post-prison supervision; or
(f) On conditional release under ORS 420A.206.
(3) Notwithstanding  the fact that the court has sentenced a person to a term of incarceration,
when an offender is committed to the custody of the supervisory authority of a county under  ORS
137.124 (2) or  (4), the supervisory authority may execute the sentence by imposing sanctions other
than incarceration if deemed appropriate by the  supervisory authority. If the supervisory authority
releases a person from custody under this subsection and  the person is required to report as a sex
offender under ORS 163A.010,  the supervisory authority, as a condition of release, shall order the
person to report to the Department of State Police, a city police department or  a county sheriff’s
office or to the supervising agency, if any:
(a) When the person is released;
(b) Within 10 days of a change of residence;
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 32
(c) Once each year within 10 days of the person’s birth date;
(d) Within 10 days of the first day the person works at, carries  on a vocation at or attends an
institution of higher education; and
(e) Within 10 days of a change in work, vocation or  attendance status at an institution of higher
education.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Attends,” “institution of higher education,” “works” and “carries on a vocation” have  the
meanings given those terms in ORS 163A.005.
(b) “Designated drug-related misdemeanor” means:
(A) Unlawful possession of methadone under ORS 475.824 (2)(b);
(B) Unlawful possession of oxycodone under ORS 475.834 (2)(b);
(C) Unlawful possession of heroin under ORS 475.854 (2)(b);
(D) Unlawful possession of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine under ORS 475.874 (2)(b);
(E) Unlawful possession of cocaine under ORS 475.884 (2)(b); or
(F) Unlawful possession of methamphetamine under ORS 475.894 (2)(b).
(c) “Designated person misdemeanor” means:
(A) Assault in the  fourth degree constituting domestic violence if the judgment document
is as described in ORS 163.160 (4);
(B) Menacing constituting domestic violence if the judgment document  is as described in
ORS 163.190 (3); or
(C) Sexual abuse in the third degree under ORS 163.415.
SECTION 44b.
If Senate Bill 497 becomes  law, section 6, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill 497), is repealed.
SECTION 44c. If Senate Bill 497 becomes law, notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the General Fund appropriation made  to the Department of Corrections by section 1 (4),
chapter , Oregon Laws 2021  (Enrolled House Bill 5004), for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2021, for community corrections, is increased by $7,060,171, in order to implement the
amendments to ORS 423.478 by section 44a of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 44d.
If Senate Bill 497 becomes law, sections 44b and 44c of  this 2021 Act and
the amendments to ORS 423.478  by section 44a of this 2021 Act become operative on January
1, 2022.
SECTION 45.  ORS 135.242 is amended to read:
135.242. (1) When a  defendant is charged with an offense described in subsection (7) of this
section, the court may not release the defendant on any form of release other than a security release
and shall set a security amount of not less than $500,000 if the court finds:
(a) Except when the defendant is charged by indictment,  that there is probable cause to believe
that the defendant committed the crime; and
(b) By clear and convincing evidence that there is a danger that the defendant will:
(A) Fail to appear in court at all appropriate times;
(B) Commit a new criminal offense; or
(C) Pose a threat to the reasonable protection of the public.
(2) If the defendant wants to have a  hearing on the issue of release, the defendant must request
the hearing at the time of arraignment in circuit court. If the  defendant requests a release hearing,
the court must hold the hearing within five days of the request.
(3) At the release  hearing, unless the state stipulates to the setting of a security amount less
than $500,000, the court shall make the inquiry set forth in subsection (1) of this section. The state
has the burden of producing evidence at the release hearing subject to ORS 40.015 (4).
(4) The defendant may be  represented by counsel and may present evidence on any relevant is-
sue. However, the hearing may not be used for purposes of discovery.
(5) If the court determines that the defendant is eligible for a security  amount of less than
$500,000, the court shall reduce the security amount to an amount not less than $50,000 and may
set other appropriate conditions of release.
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 33
(6) When a defendant who has been released after posting the security amount described  in
subsection (5) of this section violates a condition of release and the violation:
(a) Constitutes a new criminal offense, the court shall cause  the defendant to be taken back into
custody and shall impose a security amount of not less than $500,000.
(b) Does  not constitute a new criminal offense, the court may order the defendant to be taken
back into custody,  may order the defendant held pending trial and may set a security amount of not
less than $250,000.
(7) The offenses to which subsection (1) of this section applies are:
(a) Manufacture of methamphetamine under ORS 475.886.
(b) Manufacture of methamphetamine within 1,000 feet of a school under ORS 475.888.
(c) Delivery of methamphetamine within 1,000 feet of a school under ORS 475.892.
(d) Delivery of methamphetamine under ORS 475.890 if the delivery involves:
(A) Substantial quantities of methamphetamine under ORS 475.900 [ (1)(a)(C)] (1)(a)(D) ; or
(B) A commercial drug offense under ORS 475.900 (1)(b).
(e) Delivery of methamphetamine to a minor under ORS 475.906.
(8) Nothing in this section  affects the ability of a county court or board of commissioners of a
county to adopt or implement a jail capacity limit and action plan under ORS 169.042 to 169.046.
PENDING CHARGES
SECTION 46.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 161.566, a prosecuting  attorney may elect to treat
as a Class E violation any offense that would constitute a Class E violation  had the offense
been committed on or after February 1, 2021, as described in this section.
(2) If the prosecuting attorney elects to treat an offense as  a Class E violation under this
section, with the consent of the defendant and as part of the same  hearing, the prosecuting
attorney shall move to dismiss  the original offense and simultaneously initiate a Class E vi-
olation proceeding. In providing consent under this subsection, the defendant waives any
challenge to the Class E violation under ORS 131.125.
(3) If,  at the hearing described in subsection (2) of this section, the court has received
verification that the  defendant has obtained a screening through a Behavioral Health Re-
source Network, including the telephone hotline described in section 23 (1), chapter 2, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), or any other equivalent or more intensive treatment
contact, the court shall dismiss the citation.
EFFECTIVE AND OPERATIVE DATES
SECTION 47.
 Section 25, chapter 2, Oregon Laws  2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), is amended
to read:
Sec. 25.  [ Effective and Operative Dates. ] (1) [ This Act ] Chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021  (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)),  shall become effective pursuant to Article IV,  section 1 (4)(d) , of the Oregon
Constitution.
(2) Section 22, chapter 2, Oregon  Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), and  the amend-
ments to statutes by [ section] sections  11 to [ section] 21, [ and section 22, ] chapter 2, Oregon Laws
2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)),  become operative on February 1, 2021.
REPEAL
SECTION 48. Section 24a of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2024.
CAPTIONS
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 34
SECTION 49. The unit captions used in this 2021 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 50. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2021
Repassed by Senate June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 755 (SB 755-C) Page 35